District of Columbia statutes.
7-735

Repealed

Public Health Laboratory Fund.

Repealed.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4906, 48 DCR 6981
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9078(a), 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 6 of Department of Health Functions Clarification Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-60, June 6, 2001, 48 DCR 5701).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4406 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).